Hawaii statutes.
[§201H-203] Eligible applicants for funds.
Eligible applicants for funds shall include nonprofit and for-profit
organizations, limited liability companies, partnerships, and government
agencies, who are qualified in accordance with rules adopted by the corporation
pursuant to chapter 91. [L 2006, c 180, pt of §4]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next